Idaho, session 2025, H0236.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-205, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-205. DENIAL OF SCHOOL ATTENDANCE. (1) The board of trustees may
deny enrollment, or may deny or attendance at any of its schools by expul-
sion, to any pupil who is a habitual truant, or who is incorrigible, or whose:
(a) Who is habitually truant;
(b) Whose conduct, in the judgment of the board, is such as to be contin-
uously disruptive of school discipline or of the instructional effec-
tiveness of the school, or whose;
(c) Whose presence in a public school is detrimental to the health and
safety of other pupils, or who;
(d) Who has possessed a deadly or dangerous weapon or firearm on school
property, or who has been;
(e) Who has been denied enrollment due to behavior detrimental to the
health and safety of other pupils, disenrolled in lieu of discipline, or
expelled from another school district in this state or any other state.;
or
(f) Who has a conviction or adjudication for any of the offenses under
section 20-525A(5), Idaho Code, or chapter 9, 61, or 66, title 18, Idaho
Code. Such convictions or adjudications shall be disclosed by a par-
ent or legal guardian of a pupil to any school district where the pupil
is seeking enrollment or is enrolled. The parent's or legal guardian's
failure to disclose such convictions shall constitute adequate grounds
to deny enrollment or attendance to such pupil.
(2) Discipline of students with disabilities shall be in accordance
with the requirements of federal law part B of the individuals with disabili-
ties education act and section 504 of the rehabilitation act.
(3) Any pupil having been denied enrollment or expelled may be enrolled
or readmitted to the school by the board of trustees upon such reasonable
conditions as may be prescribed by the board; but such enrollment or readmis-
sion shall not prevent the board from again expelling such pupil for cause.
(2) (4) Provided however, the board shall expel from school for a pe-
riod of not no less than one (1) year, twelve (12) calendar months, or may
deny enrollment to a student who has been found to have possessed a firearm on


school property in this state or any other state. The board may modify such
expulsion or denial of enrollment requirement on a case-by-case basis when
the board determines reasonable conditions apply and the student's presence
is not detrimental to the health and safety of other students. Discipline
of students with disabilities shall be in accordance with the requirements
of federal law part B of the individuals with disabilities education act and
section 504 of the rehabilitation act. An authorized representative of the
board shall report such student and incident to the appropriate law enforce-
ment agency.
(3) (5) No pupil shall be expelled or denied enrollment without the
board of trustees having first given written notice to the parent or legal
guardian of the pupil, which notice shall state the grounds for the proposed
expulsion or denial of enrollment and the time and place where such parent or
legal guardian may appear to contest the action of the board to deny school
attendance and which notice shall state the rights of the pupil to be rep-
resented by counsel, to produce witnesses and submit evidence on his own
behalf, and to cross-examine any adult witnesses who may appear against him.
Within a reasonable period of time following such notification, the board of
trustees shall grant the pupil and his parents or legal guardian a full and
fair hearing on the proposed expulsion or denial of enrollment. However,
the board shall allow a reasonable period of time between such notification
and the holding of such hearing to allow the pupil and his parents or legal
guardian to prepare their response to the charge. Notwithstanding the pro-
visions of sections 74-205 and 74-206, Idaho Code, a decision to expel or
to deny enrollment of a student may be made in executive session, and the
student shall not be named in the minutes of the meeting. A record of the
decision shall be placed in the student's educational record and in the offi-
cial records of the board. Any pupil within the age of compulsory attendance
who is expelled or denied enrollment as herein provided shall come under the
purview of the juvenile corrections act, and an authorized representative of
the board shall, within five (5) days, give written notice of the pupil's ex-
pulsion to the prosecuting attorney of the county of the pupil's residence.
(4) (6) The superintendent of any district or the principal of any
school may temporarily suspend any pupil for disciplinary reasons, includ-
ing student harassment, intimidation or bullying, or for other conduct dis-
ruptive of good order or of the instructional effectiveness of the school.
A temporary suspension by the principal shall not exceed five (5) school
days, and the school superintendent may extend the temporary suspension an
additional ten (10) school days. Provided, that on a finding by the board
of trustees, which finding must shall be made in executive session, that
immediate return to school attendance by the temporarily suspended student
would be detrimental to other pupils' health, welfare, or safety, the board
of trustees may extend the temporary suspension for an additional five (5)
school days. Prior to suspending any student, the superintendent or princi-
pal shall grant an informal hearing on the reasons for the suspension and the
opportunity to challenge those reasons. Any pupil who has been suspended may
be readmitted to the school by the superintendent or principal who suspended
him upon such reasonable conditions as said superintendent or principal may
prescribe. The board of trustees shall be notified of any temporary suspen-
sions, the reasons therefor, and the response, if any, thereto.


(5) (7) The board of trustees of each school district shall establish
the procedure to be followed by the superintendent and principals under its
jurisdiction for the purpose of effecting a temporary suspension, which pro-
cedure must shall conform to the minimal requirements of due process and af-
ford the pupil privacy.
(6) (8) As used in this section, "possess," "deadly or dangerous
weapon," and "firearm" have the same meanings as provided in section
18-3302D, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-1402, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1402. ENROLLMENT OPTIONS. (1) Each school district shall implement
an enrollment options program as provided in this section. School districts
shall adopt policies to govern the process for enrollment options pursuant
to this chapter, including in-district transfers. The policies shall pro-
hibit discrimination against any pupil on the basis of his residential ad-
dress, ability, disability, race, ethnicity, sex, or socioeconomic status.
Such policies shall be posted to the school district's website. Schools of
choice within a district that have lottery enrollment policies are not sub-
ject to the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Whenever the parent or legal guardian of any Idaho pupil determines
that it is in the best interest of the pupil to attend a school within another
district, or to attend another school within the home district, such pupil
may be transferred to and attend the selected school, subject to the provi-
sions of this section and section 33-1404, Idaho Code.
(3) The pupil's parent or legal guardian must shall apply for admis-
sion to a school within another district, or to another school within the
home district, on a form provided by the state department of education or a
district-provided form that is substantially similar. The application must
shall be submitted to the receiving school district by February 1 for enroll-
ment during the following school year, and notice of such application must
shall be given to the home district. At the time of application, the parent
or legal guardian must shall request that the home district or school for-
ward the pupil's student record. The home district or school shall respond
by forwarding a certified copy of the transferred student's record within
ten (10) days, unless the provisions of section 18-4511, Idaho Code, apply.
The receiving school district, or the receiving school within the home dis-
trict, shall notify the applicant within sixty (60) days and, if denied, must
shall include written explanation of the denial.
(4) There may be times during the school year when a parent or legal
guardian believes it is in the best interest of the pupil to transfer
schools. Open enrollment applications shall be accepted at any time
throughout the year. However, those applications received after the Febru-
ary 1 deadline will be considered based on capacity stated in policy at the
receiving district.
(5) Priority for enrollment under this section shall be given to pupils
applying to attend another school within the home district.
(6) A district may deny a transfer application for the following rea-
sons:
(a) The pupil was expelled by the pupil's previous district;


(b) The pupil has a documented history of significant disciplinary is-
sues;
(c) The pupil has a conviction or adjudication for any of the offenses
under section 20-525A(5), Idaho Code, or chapter 9, 61, or 66, title 18,
Idaho Code;
(c) (d) The pupil has a documented history of chronic absenteeism; or
(d) (e) The receiving district does not have space available pursuant
to section 33-1409, Idaho Code. Where applicable, a denial may include
information about other schools that are below maximum enrollment.
(7) For a pupil accepted by the receiving school or district, the par-
ent or legal guardian does not need to reapply to regain acceptance the next
school year. However, the parent or legal guardian must shall provide no-
tice to the receiving school or district of intent for the pupil to reenroll.
The district may prescribe the form of notice. Once a pupil has been enrolled
at the same school for a second consecutive year, the pupil may complete his
education at such school, unless the pupil's approved transfer has been re-
voked pursuant to this section.
(8) Whenever any pupil enrolls in and attends a school outside the dis-
trict within which the parent or legal guardian resides, the parent or legal
guardian shall be responsible for transporting the pupil to and from the
school or to an appropriate bus stop within the receiving district. For stu-
dents attending another school within the home district, the parent or legal
guardian is responsible for transporting the pupil to and from an appropri-
ate bus stop. Tuition shall be waived for parents or legal guardians of any
Idaho pupils allowed under the provisions of this section. Tuition charged
to the debtor district may be waived by the creditor district.
(9) A pupil who applies and is accepted in a nonresident school district
is subject to the policy of the receiving school district and shall be ineli-
gible to again apply for an enrollment option or the transfer approval may be
revoked in that nonresident district if:
(a) The pupil is chronically absent;
(b) The pupil commits repeated, serious disciplinary infractions;
(c) The pupil commits disciplinary infractions that result in expul-
sion; or
(d) The pupil has a conviction or adjudication for any of the offenses
under section 20-525A(5), Idaho Code, or chapter 9, 61, or 66, title 18,
Idaho Code; or
(d) (e) The school in which the student is enrolled exceeds maximum
enrollment of resident pupils due to growth. However, pursuant to sub-
section (7) of this section, the receiving district may not revoke a
transfer approval to a school after two (2) consecutive years of atten-
dance. If a transfer approval is revoked under this subsection, the
receiving district must shall offer the pupil information about other
schools within the district that are below maximum enrollment.
(10) A receiving school shall inform the parent or legal guardian of the
circumstances that jeopardize the student's status at a transfer school.
(11) No district shall take any action to prohibit or prevent applica-
tion by resident pupils to attend school in another school district or to at-
tend another school within the home district.


SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.